Utah statutes.
4-13-8.   Suspension or revocation authorized -- Refusal to register authorized -- Grounds -- Stop sale, use, or removal order authorized -- Court action -- Procedure -- Costs.

(1)  The department may revoke or suspend the registration of any brand of commercial fertilizer or soil amendment, or refuse to register any brand of commercial fertilizer or soil amendment upon satisfactory evidence that the registrant has used fraudulent or deceptive practices in registration or distribution in this state.

(2)  The department may issue a "stop sale, use or removal order" to the owner or person in possession of any designated lot of commercial fertilizer or soil amendment which it finds or has reason to believe is being offered or exposed for sale in violation of this chapter. The order shall be in writing and no commercial fertilizer or soil amendment subject to it shall be moved or offered or exposed for sale, except upon the subsequent written release of the department. Before a release is issued, the department may require the owner or person in possession of the "stopped" lot to pay the expense incurred by the department in connection with the withdrawal of the product from the market.

(3)  The department is authorized in a court of competent jurisdiction to seek an order of seizure or condemnation of any fertilizer which violates this chapter or, upon proper grounds, to obtain a temporary restraining order or permanent injunction, to prevent violation of this chapter. No bond shall be required of the department in any injunctive proceeding under this section.

(4)  If condemnation is ordered, the fertilizer or soil amendment shall be disposed of as the court directs; provided, that in no event shall it order condemnation without giving the claimant of the fertilizer or soil amendment an opportunity to apply to the court for permission to relabel, reprocess, or otherwise bring the product into conformance, or to remove it from the state.

(5)  If the court orders condemnation of the commercial fertilizer or soil amendment, court costs, fees, storage, and other expenses shall be awarded against the claimant of the fertilizer or soil amendment.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

